Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.110

Labels on containers—Contents.

It shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, trade, barter, or to offer as an inducement for the sale of another product, milk, cream, or skim milk subject to the provisions of this chapter in containers which are not labeled in a conspicuous location readily visible to any person handling such containers with the following:

(1) The name and address of the producer or distributor in letters not less than one-fourth inch in size.

(2) The name of the contents in letters not less than one-fourth inch in size.

(3) The words "not for human consumption" in letters at least one-half inch in size.

(4) The words "decharacterized with harmless food coloring" in letters not less than one-fourth inch in size.

[ 1961 c 285 s 11.]